California statutes. Education Code
(d) If a provision in a section listed in subdivision (a) requires that action be taken within a specified number of days of a mailing date, and electronic delivery has been
 substituted for delivery by mail, date of electronic delivery shall substitute for date of mailing for purposes of measuring the number of days within which an action is to be taken.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 459, Sec. 2.   (AB 989)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

22338.

(a) (1) This section applies to current employees of the system as a condition of their employment as well as applicants who apply to become employees of the system while a tentative offer is still pending. 

(2) The criminal history check authorized by this section is limited to those employees and applicants whose duties include, or would include, any of the following:

(A) Access to confidential or sensitive information and data maintained by the system or submitted to the system by its members and others.

(B) The system’s chief executive officer performing duties pursuant to Section 22301.

(C) Legal services and operations.

(D) Actuarial, investment, audit, accounting, and financial services.

(E) A position that requires driving as an essential function of the position.

(b) The system shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the department of each employee and applicant for employment, specified in subdivision (a), in accordance with subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(c) The Department of Justice shall provide a state or federal response to the system pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(d) The system shall use
 the records and information received from the Department of Justice pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) exclusively for the purposes of employment subject to Section 19572 of the Government Code and to screen applicants for employment while a tentative offer is still pending with the system.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 159, Sec. 1.   (SB 885)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Investments [22350. - 22364.]

22350.

The Legislature finds and declares that changing economic conditions and increasing complexity in the investment market make it necessary and desirable that the system obtain the best possible investment expertise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22351.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the board secure investment advisors with the composite expertise necessary for the investment of the retirement fund portfolio.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22352.

Upon a finding by the board that necessary investment expertise is not available within existing civil service classifications, and with the approval of the State Personnel Board, the board may, pursuant to policy adopted by the board, establish competitive bidding processes, and specify the contract terms and conditions it solely deems necessary and prudent to contract with qualified investment managers and investment advisers, as defined in Section 22143, having demonstrated expertise in
 managing, or advising the management of, large and diverse investment portfolios to render service in connection with the investment program of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 619, Sec. 1.   (AB 539)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

22353.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board shall by contract retain not less than two separate individual investment advisers.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, there is hereby continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal years, from the retirement fund, an amount sufficient to pay all costs arising from this section.

(c) No costs arising from this section shall be paid from the General Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22354.

(a) The board shall, pursuant to the state civil service statutes, either contract with, or establish and fill full-time positions for, investment managers who are experienced and knowledgeable in corporate management issues to monitor each corporation any of whose shares are owned by the plan and to advise the board on the voting of the shares owned by the plan and on the responses of the system to merger proposals and tender offers and all other matters pertaining to corporate governance.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, there is hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, from the retirement fund, an amount sufficient to pay all costs arising from this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22355.

In no event shall the board employ through interagency agreement any investment personnel who would also serve during the term of the agreement as investment staff to the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22356.

The board may apply to reduce the book value of securities purchased, all or part of the excess of the proceeds of the sale or redemption prior to maturity of securities over the book value of the securities sold or redeemed provided the purchase of securities is made with those proceeds and provided that the terms of both securities from the date of sale, redemption, or purchase, as the case may be, to the respective dates of maturity, do not differ by more than five years. All applications of excess of sales or redemption proceeds, even with greater difference in terms, made by the board before October 1, 1949, are hereby validated and confirmed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22359.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board may retain a bank or trust company to serve as custodian for safekeeping, delivery, securities valuation, investment performance reporting, and other services in connection with investment of the retirement fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22360.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board may pursuant to Section 22203 and in conformance with its fiduciary duty set forth in Section 22250, enter into correspondent agreements with private lending institutions in this state to utilize the retirement fund to invest in residential mortgages, including assisting borrowers, through financing, to obtain homes in this state.

(b) The program shall, among other things, provide:

(1) That home loans be made available to borrowers for the purchase of single-family dwellings, two-family dwellings, three-family dwellings, four-family dwellings, single-family cooperative apartments, and single-family condominiums.

(2) That the recipients of the loans occupy the homes as their principal residences in accordance with policies established by the board.

(3) That the home loans shall be available only for the purchase or refinance of homes in this state.

(4) That the amount and length of the loans shall be pursuant to a schedule periodically established by the board that shall provide a loan of up to 100 percent of the appraised value. In no event shall the loan amount exceed 200 percent of the conforming loan limit set by the Federal National Mortgage Association (FNMA) or 200 percent of the conforming loan limit set by the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation (FHLMC), whichever is greater. The portion of any loan exceeding 80 percent of value shall be insured by an admitted mortgage guaranty insurer conforming to Chapter 2A (commencing with Section 12640.01) of Part 6 of Division 2 of the Insurance Code, in an amount so that the unguaranteed portion of the loan does not exceed 75 percent of the market value of the property together with improvements thereon.

(5) That there may be prepayment penalties assessed on the loans in accordance with policies established by the board.

(6) That the criteria and terms for its loans shall be consistent with the financial integrity of the program and the sound investment of the retirement fund.

(7) Any other terms and conditions as the board shall deem appropriate.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the provisions of this section be used to establish an investment program for residential mortgages, including assisting borrowers in purchasing homes in this state, or refinancing a mortgage loan. The Legislature intends that home loans made pursuant to this section shall be secured primarily by the property purchased or refinanced and shall not exceed the appraised value of that property.

(d) Appropriate administrative costs of implementing this section and Section 22360.5 shall be paid by the participating borrowers. Those costs may be included in the loan amount.

(e) Appropriate interest rates shall be periodically reviewed and adjusted to provide loans to borrowers consistent with the financial integrity of the home loan program and the sound and prudent investment of the retirement fund. Under no circumstances, however, shall the interest rates offered to borrowers be below current market rate.

(f) The board shall administer this section and Section 22360.5 under other terms and conditions it deems appropriate and in keeping with the investment standard. The board may adopt policies as necessary for its administration of this section and Section 22360.5 and to assure compliance with applicable state and federal laws.

(g) This section and Section 22360.5 shall be known as, and may be cited as, the Dave Elder State Teachers’ Retirement System Home Loan Program Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 802, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

22360.5.

(a) The board may include in any investment program established pursuant to Section 22360 a procedure whereby a member may obtain 100 percent financing for the purchase for a single-family dwelling unit in accordance with the following criteria:

(1) The member shall obtain one loan secured by the purchased home, pursuant to Section 22360, and a second personal loan secured by a portion of the accumulated retirement contributions in the member’s individual account. The personal loan shall only be used for the purchase of the member’s principal residence and not for a loan to refinance the member’s existing mortgage.

(2) The loan secured by the purchased home shall be consistent with the requirements imposed by Section 22360.

(3) In no event may the personal loan secured by the accumulated retirement contributions in the member’s individual account exceed the lesser of 50 percent of the current value amount of the accumulated retirement contributions or fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(4) If two members are married, the personal loan secured by the sum total of accumulated retirement contributions in both members’ accounts shall not exceed 5 percent of the loan.

(5) The pledge of security under this section shall remain in effect until the personal loan is paid in full.

(b) The pledge of security under this section shall take binding effect. In the event of a default on the personal loan secured by the member’s retirement contributions as authorized by this section, the board shall deduct an amount from the member’s accumulated retirement contributions on deposit and adjust the member’s accumulated retirement contributions as necessary to recover any outstanding loan balance prior to making any disbursement of a refund or a lump-sum distribution.

(c) In the event of a default on the personal loan by a member, the board shall deduct the monthly principal plus appropriate interest from the member’s benefit, when the member begins receiving a benefit, until the loan is paid in full.

(d) In the event of a default on the personal loan by a member receiving a benefit, the board shall deduct the monthly principal and interest from the member’s benefit until the personal loan is paid in full.

(e) The secured personal loan permitted under this section shall be made available only to members who meet eligibility criteria as determined by the board.

(f) In the event of a refund or lump-sum distribution of the accumulated retirement contributions, the member’s account shall be adjusted as necessary to recover any outstanding loan balance.

(g) If the member is married at the time the home is purchased with a personal loan secured by the member’s accumulated retirement contributions as authorized by this section, then the member’s spouse shall agree in writing to the pledge of security, as to his or her community interest in the amount pledged, regardless of whether title to the home is held in joint tenancy.

(h) For purposes of the section only, “member” means any person who is entitled to receive an allowance funded by the system pursuant to this part or Part 14, notwithstanding any vesting requirement and without regard to present eligibility to retire, and who is not retired or disabled.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 939, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

22361.

(a) The board may, subject to and consistent with its fiduciary duty, establish a program utilizing the retirement fund to assist currently employed members and retired members who are victims of a natural disaster to obtain loans from the retirement fund for the sole purpose of repairing or rebuilding their homes that have been damaged by a natural disaster. In order to qualify for such a loan, the home of the currently employed member or retired member shall have been damaged by a natural disaster and the home shall have been in an area that has been declared a disaster area in a proclamation of the Governor of a state of emergency affecting the area in which the currently employed member or retired member resides.

(b) The board may loan any amount of money, up to and including 100 percent of the current appraised value of a home of a currently employed member or retired member. However, 5 percent of the loan may, at the discretion of the board, be secured by the contributions of the member who requests the loan.

(c) The board may, under such conditions as it may deem prudent, require that a currently employed member or retired member pledge other assets as collateral for a loan.

(d) The board shall establish terms for the termination of loans made pursuant to this section upon the separation of members from service, to ensure, in the case of any default, that the fund shall not suffer any loss and to provide, as a condition of retirement, for alternative security. The board may impose any other terms and conditions the board may determine appropriate.

(e) The Legislature hereby reserves full power and authority to change, revise, limit, expand, or repeal the loan program authorized by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 634, Sec. 92.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22362.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board shall give first priority to investing not less than 25 percent of all funds of the plan that become available in a fiscal year for new investments, in any of the following:

(1) Obligations secured by a lien or charge solely on residential realty, including rental housing, located in the state and on the security of which, commercial banks are permitted to make loans pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 1220) of Chapter 10 of Division 1 of the Financial Code.

(2) Securities representing a beneficial interest in a pool of obligations secured by a lien or charge solely on residential realty located in the state.

(3) Certificates of deposit issued by savings and loan associations, if the savings and loan associations agree to make loans, or to fund tax-exempt notes or bonds issued by housing authorities, cities, or counties, on residential realty located in the state, including rental housing, in an amount equal to the amount of the deposit.

(b) Funds subject to investment pursuant to this section include all moneys received as employer and member contributions, investment income, and the proceeds from all net gains and losses from securities, reduced by the amount of benefit payments and withdrawals occurring during the fiscal year. In computing the amount of investment pursuant to this section, a dollar-for-dollar credit shall be given for residential realty investments described in this section that are contractually agreed to be made by a financial institution from which the board, in consideration thereof, purchases other such investments. In computing the amount of investment pursuant to this section, the board may elect to include the dollar amount of commitments to purchase mortgages from public revenue bond programs in the year the commitment is given. However, that election may not exceed one-fifth of the total guideline amount.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the acquisition of any instrument or security at less than the market rate.

(d) If the board determines during any fiscal year that compliance with this section will result in lower overall earnings for the retirement fund than obtainable from alternative investment opportunities that would provide equal or superior security, including guarantee of yield, the board may substitute those higher yielding investments, to the extent actually available for acquisition, for the investments otherwise specified by this section. Additionally, if, and to the extent that, adherence to the diversification guideline specified in this section would conflict with its fiduciary obligations in violation of Section 9 of Article I of the California Constitution or Section 10 of Article I of the United States Constitution, or would conflict with the standard for prudent investment of the fund as set forth in Section 17 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the board may substitute alternative investments.

(e) The board, upon determining the final amount of funds available for investment in substitute alternative investments and the estimated amount of funds invested pursuant to subdivision (a), shall submit that information to the Governor and the Joint Legislative Audit Committee. Thereafter, the Joint Legislative Audit Committee shall transmit the report of the State Auditor to the Speaker of the Assembly and the Senate Committee on Rules for transmittal to the affected policy committees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 654, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

22363.

No matter involving any vendor or contractor, in their individual or any other capacity, shall be considered during a closed session on any transaction involving the system unless, prior to the closed session, a written disclosure has been submitted by the vendor or contractor of any campaign contributions aggregating two hundred fifty dollars ($250) or more and any gifts aggregating fifty dollars ($50) or more in value that the vendor or contractor has made during the preceding calendar year to any member of the board or any officer or employee of the system. Failure to disclose the campaign contributions and gifts shall provide the basis for disqualification of the contractor or the vendor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 923, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22364.

(a) During the process leading to an award of any contract by the system, no member of the board or its staff shall knowingly communicate concerning any matter relating to the contract or selection process with any party financially interested in the contract, or an officer or employee of that party, unless the communication is (1) part of the process expressly described in the request for proposal or other solicitation invitation, or (2) part of a noticed board meeting, or (3) as provided in subdivision (c). Any applicant or bidder who knowingly participates in a communication that is prohibited by this paragraph shall be disqualified from the contract award.

(b) During the evaluation of any prospective investment transaction, no party who is financially interested in the transaction, or an officer or employee of that party, may knowingly communicate with any board member concerning any matter relating to the transaction or its evaluation, unless the financially interested party discloses the content of the communication in a writing addressed and submitted to the executive officer and the board prior to the board’s action on the prospective transaction. This subdivision shall not apply to communications that are part of a noticed board meeting, or as provided in subdivision (c).

(1) The writing shall disclose the date and location of the communication, and the substance of the matters discussed. The board shall prescribe other procedures concerning this disclosure.

(2) Any board member who participates in a communication subject to this subdivision shall also have the obligation to disclose the communication to the executive officer and board, prior to the board’s action on the prospective transaction. The board shall prescribe procedures for this disclosure, including procedures to apply to board members who fail to disclose communications as required by this subdivision.

(3) Consistent with its fiduciary duties, the board shall determine the appropriate remedy for any knowing failure of a financially interested party to comply with this subdivision including, but not limited to, outright rejection of the prospective investment transaction, reduction in fee income, or any other sanction.

(4) The communications disclosed under this subdivision shall be made public, either at the open meeting of the board in which the transaction is considered, or if in closed session, upon public disclosure of any closed session votes concerning the investment transaction.

(c) The procedures and prohibitions prescribed by this section shall not apply to:

(1) Communications that are incidental, exclusively social, and do not involve the system or its business, or the board or staff member’s role as a system official.

(2) Communications that do not involve the system or its business and that are within the scope of the board or staff member’s private business or public office wholly unrelated to the system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 923, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. System Headquarters [22375. - 22380.]

22375.

Notwithstanding Part 11 (commencing with Section 15850) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the board may select, purchase, or acquire in the name of the plan, the fee or any lesser interest in real property, improved or unimproved, and may remodel and equip, or construct an office building in the greater metropolitan Sacramento area, including the City of Sacramento, the County of Sacramento, and the eastern part of Yolo County, for the purposes of establishing a permanent headquarters facility for the system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 378, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

22376.

All buildings acquired or improvements constructed by the board under the provisions of this chapter may contain space in excess of immediate requirements. The board may contract with the Department of General Services to handle the rentals of any excess space over and above that required by the board and to furnish general supervision and maintenance of buildings and improvements constructed under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22377.

The board may contract with the Department of General Services or any other state agency for assistance in the acquisition of real property and any construction thereon of buildings or improvements authorized by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22378.

In the event that condemnation of the property selected is necessary, the board may elect to deposit with the treasurer funds it deems necessary, and that are appropriated, for purchase of the selected property subject to the Property Acquisition Law (Part 11 (commencing with Section 15850) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22379.

Work on all projects shall be done under contract awarded to the lowest responsible bidder pursuant to bidding procedures set forth in the State Contract Act (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22380.

(a) The board shall establish a building account for the transfer of money appropriated for that purpose from the retirement fund for the construction or remodeling of buildings and improvements thereon, maintenance, repair, and improvement thereof.

(b) The board may contract with the Department of General Services for the purchase of insurance against loss of, or damage to, the property or the loss of use or occupancy of the building, liability insurance, and other insurance that is customarily carried on state office buildings. Premiums for this insurance shall be paid from the building account.

(c) The land,
 building, equipment, and improvements thereon, shall constitute an investment of the system and shall be carried on the books thereof in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 207, Sec. 6.   (AB 2260)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Establishment and Control of Funds [22400. - 22404.]

22400.

(a) There is in the State Treasury a special trust fund to be known as the Teachers’ Retirement Fund. There shall be deposited in that fund the assets of the plan and its predecessors, consisting of employee contributions, employer contributions, state contributions, appropriations made to it by the Legislature, income on investments, other interest income, income from fees and penalties, donations, legacies, bequests made to it and accepted by the board, and any other amounts provided by this part and Part 14. General Fund transfers pursuant to Section 22954 shall be placed in a segregated account known as the Supplemental Benefit Maintenance Account within the retirement fund, which is continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal years, notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, for expenditure for the purposes of Section 24415.

(b) Disbursement of money from the retirement fund of whatever nature shall be made upon claims duly audited in the manner prescribed for the disbursement of other public funds except that notwithstanding the foregoing disbursements may be made to return funds deposited in the fund in error.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 939, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

22401.

Return on investments shall be collected by the Treasurer, and together with any other moneys received for the retirement fund shall be immediately deposited to the credit of that fund and reported immediately to the system. Money in whatever form received directly by the system shall be deposited immediately in the State Treasury to the credit of that fund.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22402.

Earned interest on plan assets with respect to the Defined Benefit Program that is not credited to member accounts under the Defined Benefit Program and the plan’s other income with respect to the Defined Benefit Program shall be allocated to provide benefits payable under the Defined Benefit Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1025, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22403.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that pursuant to the authorizing legislation creating and establishing the Cash Balance Plan, the board transferred one million dollars ($1,000,000) in the form of a loan from the retirement fund holding assets at that time exclusively for the State Teachers’ Retirement System Defined Benefit Plan to the newly created Cash Balance Plan. That loan represented an asset receivable to the State Teachers’ Retirement System Defined Benefit Plan and a liability obligation to the State Teachers’ Retirement System Cash Balance Plan. As a result of the merger of these two plans authorized under this part, the assets held in the retirement fund shall hereby reflect the combined assets of the State Teachers’ Retirement Plan. That loan shall be discharged by the creation and establishment of the State Teachers’ Retirement Plan pursuant to the merger.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1048, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22404.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part or Part 14 (commencing with Section 26000) to the contrary, the board may establish by plan amendment a specified amount or amounts, not to exceed ten dollars ($10), below which the system may dispense with:

 (1) The processing of a benefit payment, an annuity payment, or any other payment, including adjustments to those payments, payable to a member, participant, or beneficiary.

(2) The collection of a benefit overpayment, annuity overpayment, or any other overpayments paid to a member, participant, or beneficiary.

(b) When the cumulative dollar amount associated with one or more
 benefit payments or overpayments, annuity payments or overpayments, or other payments or overpayments equals or exceeds the amount described in subdivision (a), that amount shall be paid to, or collected from, the member, participant, or beneficiary. That cumulative amount paid or collected shall not be credited with interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 123, Sec. 7.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Member and Employer Duties [22450. - 22461.]

22450.

(a) Each member and beneficiary shall furnish to the board any information affecting his or her status as a member or beneficiary of the Defined Benefit Program as the board requires, which may include, but shall not be limited to, the following:

(1) Financial statements, certified copies of state and federal income tax records, or evidence of financial status.

(2) Employment, legal, or medical documentation.

(b) A member who has not had any creditable service reported during the prior school year shall provide the system with his or her current mailing
 address and beneficiary information.

(c) For a trust that is designated as an option beneficiary, as defined in Section 22149, the following documentation is required: 

(1) The member shall provide an acknowledged certification that includes each declaration prescribed by clause A-6 of Section 1.401(a)(9)-4 of Title 26 of the Code of Federal Regulations and a declaration that the trust meets the requirements and conditions as defined in Section 22149. The certification shall be submitted to the system at the time of election of the beneficiary and is required for the election to be valid. The certification shall be in the form of an acknowledged declaration signed by the member and by all then-acting trustees of the trust.

(2) After the member’s death, the then-acting trustee or trustees of the trust shall provide an
 acknowledged certification that includes each of the declarations prescribed by clause A-6 of Section 1.401(a)(9)-4 of Title 26 of the Code of Federal Regulations and a declaration that the trust meets the requirements and conditions provided in Section 22149. The certification by the trustee or trustees of the trust shall be submitted to the system upon the member’s death and shall additionally certify that the trust has not been revoked, modified, or amended in any manner which would cause the representations contained in the certification to be incorrect. The certification shall contain a statement that it is being signed by all of the then-acting trustees of the trust and shall be in the form of an acknowledged declaration signed by all the then-acting trustees.

(3) At any time, upon demand by the system, the member or trustee of the trust shall provide a copy of the trust instrument.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 559, Sec. 3.   (AB 1875)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

22451.

(a) Each member shall file a statement with the board, at the option of, and upon the form furnished by, the system, giving the following information:

(1) Date of birth.

(2) All service previously performed subject to coverage by the plan or its predecessors.

(b) Each person becoming a member on or after January 1, 1983, shall include in the health résumé required by the teacher preparation and licensing agency all information that shall verify any and all handicaps and disabling conditions at the time of application. Upon request by the system this information shall be made available when an application for disability benefits is received.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 634, Sec. 96.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22451.5.

(a) Upon request by the system, a member shall provide proof of his or her date of birth to resolve any discrepancy between the member’s date of birth as originally documented on the records of the system and the member’s date of birth as subsequently submitted.

(b) A member shall provide proof of the date of birth of a person who is, or the beneficiary of a trust that is, designated by the member as beneficiary under an option selected pursuant to Chapter 28 (commencing with Section 24300) if the beneficiary is not also a member of the plan.

(c) Documentation substantiating the date of birth of a member’s dependent
 child shall be provided if an allowance payable under this part will include an amount for that dependent child.

(d) At the time application is made for payment of a family allowance or survivor benefit allowance to a surviving spouse or dependent parent, a member’s surviving spouse or dependent parent shall provide proof of his or her date of birth.

(e) At the discretion of the board, an original document, a certified copy of the original, or a photocopy shall be acceptable to establish proof of the date of birth.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 559, Sec. 4.   (AB 1875)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

22451.7.

The system may withhold benefit payments until proof of the date of birth of a member, beneficiary under an option selected pursuant to Chapter 28 (commencing with Section 24300), surviving spouse, dependent child or dependent parent has been received and accepted by the system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1165, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22453.

(a) Except as provided in Section 22454, the signature of the spouse of a member shall be required under the Defined Benefit Program on any application for, or cancellation of, an unmodified allowance; the election, change, or cancellation of an option; or any request for a refund of the member’s accumulated retirement contributions or accumulated annuity deposit contributions ; and under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program on any application for, or cancellation of, a retirement benefit, disability benefit, or termination benefit; and under either the Defined Benefit Program or the Defined Benefit Supplement Program on any other requests related to the selection of benefits by a member in which a spousal interest may be present, unless the member declares, in writing, under penalty of perjury, that one of the following conditions exists:

(1) The member is not married.

(2) The current spouse has no identifiable community property interest in the benefit.

(3) The member and spouse have executed a marriage settlement agreement pursuant to Part 5 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 4 of the Family Code that makes the community property law inapplicable to the marriage.

(4) The spouse is incapable of executing the acknowledgment because of an incapacitating mental or physical condition.

(5) The member does not know, and has taken all reasonable steps to determine, the whereabouts of the spouse.

(b) This section shall not be applicable to an application for a disability allowance under the Defined Benefit Program.

(c) The sole purpose of this section is to provide for spousal protection in the selection of specified benefits made by a member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1021, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22454.

If a spouse refuses to sign an application, as set forth in Section 22453, the member may bring an action in court to enforce the spousal signature requirement or to waive the spousal signature requirement. Either party may bring an action pursuant to Section 1101 of the Family Code to determine the rights of the party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 634, Sec. 97.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22455.

(a) The county superintendent and other employing agencies shall furnish any further information concerning any member or beneficiary the board may require.

(b) Any information or reports required to be submitted to the system by an employer pursuant to this part or Part 14 (commencing with Section 26000) shall be submitted in a form, including, but not limited to, electronic transmission, as directed by the system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 864, Sec. 6.   (AB 2663)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

22455.5.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the federal Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1990 (P.L. 101-508) requires all public employers to provide their employees with either social security coverage or membership in a qualified retirement plan.

(b) Employers shall make available criteria for membership, including optional membership, in a timely manner to all persons employed to perform creditable service subject to coverage by the Defined Benefit Program, and shall inform part-time and substitute employees, within 30 days of the date of hire, or by March 1, 1995, whichever is later, that they may elect membership in the plan’s Defined Benefit Program at any time while employed. Written acknowledgment by the employee shall be maintained in employer files on a form provided by this system.
